Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.922, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Fees. (a) The fee for a three-year registration of an all-terrain vehicle under this section, other than those registered by a dealer or manufacturer under paragraph (b) or (c), is: (1) for public use, $60; (2) for private use, deleted text begin $6deleted text end new text begin $20new text end ; and (3) for a duplicate or transfer, deleted text begin $4deleted text end new text begin $15new text end . (b) The total registration fee for all-terrain vehicles owned by a dealer and operated for demonstration or testing purposes is deleted text begin $50deleted text end new text begin $100new text end per year. Dealer registrations are not transferable. (c) The total registration fee for all-terrain vehicles owned by a manufacturer and operated for research, testing, experimentation, or demonstration purposes is deleted text begin $150deleted text end new text begin $200new text end per year. Manufacturer registrations are not transferable. (d) The onetime fee for registration of an all-terrain vehicle under subdivision 2b is deleted text begin $6deleted text end new text begin $20new text end . new text begin (e) A $45 surcharge is placed on each all-terrain vehicle licensed under paragraph (a), clause (1), and may be used only for grant-in-aid programs under section 84.927, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (4) and (6). new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The fees collected under this subdivision must be credited to the all-terrain vehicle account. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.9275, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Pass required; fee. (a) A tribal member exempt from registration under section 84.922, subdivision 1a, clause (2), or a nonresident may not operate an all-terrain vehicle on a state or grant-in-aid all-terrain vehicle trail unless the operator carries a valid nonresident all-terrain vehicle state trail pass in immediate possession. The pass must be available for inspection by a peace officer, a conservation officer, or an employee designated under section 84.0835. (b) The commissioner of natural resources shall issue a pass upon application and payment of a deleted text begin $30deleted text end new text begin $45new text end fee. The pass is valid from January 1 through December 31. Fees collected under this section, except for the issuing fee for licensing agents, shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund and, except for the electronic licensing system commission established by the commissioner under section 84.027, subdivision 15, must be used for grants-in-aid to counties and municipalities for all-terrain vehicle organizations to construct and maintain all-terrain vehicle trails and use areas. (c) A nonresident all-terrain vehicle state trail pass is not required for: (1) an all-terrain vehicle that is owned and used by the United States, another state, or a political subdivision thereof that is exempt from registration under section 84.922, subdivision 1a; (2) a person operating an all-terrain vehicle only on the portion of a trail that is owned by the person or the person's spouse, child, or parent; or (3) a nonresident operating an all-terrain vehicle that is registered according to section 84.922.